src/fst/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! # Noun inflection


!! ## Prefixes

LEXICON NounPrefixes
        nounstems ;
1Sg+:se nounstems ;
2Sg+:ne nounstems ;
3Sg+:be nounstems ;
4Sg+:ye nounstems ;
1Du+:nuhe nounstems ;
2Du+:nuhe nounstems ;
1Pl+:nuhe nounstems ;
2Pl+:nuhe nounstems ;
3Pl+:hube nounstems ;
Unsp+:ɂe  nounstems ; ! general person
Recipr+:ɂełe nounstems ;
Refl+:ɂede nounstems ;
Ar+:ho nounstems ;


!! ## Suffixes

LEXICON ALI_VH
+N+PNS:%>é # ;
+N: # ;
